Utah statutes.
70A-9a-709.   Priority.

(1)  This act determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral.  However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before this act takes effect, former Chapter 9 determines priority.

(2)  For purposes of Subsection 70A-9a-322(1), the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under Section 70A-9a-203 of this act dates from the time this act takes effect if the security interest is perfected under this act by the filing of a financing statement before this act takes effect which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former Chapter 9.  This Subsection (2) does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

